tests/ain.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../ain.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../ain.automorf.hfst
Tests:
  Adjectivalization:
    アマ<vblex><tv><adjx>: チアマ
    イェ<vblex><tv><adjx>: チイェ
    クパ<vblex><tv><adjx>: チクパ
    テレケ<vblex><tv><adjx>: チテレケ
    ペレパ<vblex><tv><adjx>: チペレパ
  Adjective:
    アㇱカン<adj>: アㇱカンネ
    キ<adj>: キオ
    ケラ<adj>: ケラアン
    ケㇺ<adj>: ケㇺウㇱ
    シセ<adj>: シサㇰ
    ヌチャㇰ<adj>: ヌチャㇰテㇰ
    ハロ<adj>: ハロコロ
    パロ<adj>: パロウン
    ヘㇰ<adj>: ヘカイ
    ラ<adj>: ラㇺ
    ラム<adj>: ラムサㇰ
    レタ<adj>: レタラ
  Adjective Comparison:
    ピリカ<adj><comp>: ナアピリカ
    ピリカ<adj><sup>: イヨッタピリカ
    ポン<adj><comp>: ナアポン
    ポン<adj><sup>: イヨッタポン
  Adjective Pluralization:
    ウェン<adj><pl>: ウェンパ
    ハロコロ<adj><pl>: ハロコロパ
    ピリカ<adj><pl>: ピリカパ
    ポン<adj><pl>: ポンパ
  Adverb:
    アシリ<adv>: アシンノ
    ソン<adv>: ソンノ
    モイレ<adv>: モイレタラ
    ラチ<adv>: ラチタラ
  Article:
    アイヌ<n><det><ind>: シネアイヌ
    アイヌ<n><sg>: シネアイヌ
    クル<n><det><def>: ネイクル
    シウェンテㇷ゚<n><sg>: シネシウェンテㇷ゚
    チェㇷ゚<n><det><def>: ネイチェㇷ゚
    チコイキㇷ゚<n><det><ind>: シネチコイキㇷ゚
    チセイ<n><det><ind>: シネチセイ
  Diminuitive:
    イセ<vblex><dim>: イセポ
    オッカィ<n><dim>: オッカィポ
    チイカナィ<n><dim>: チイカナィポ
    チカㇷ゚<n><dim>: チカㇷ゚ポ
    チㇱナィ<n><dim>: チㇱナィポ
    ト゚カラ<n><dim>: ト゚カラポ
    ポンペ<n><dim>: ポンペポ
  Intensifier:
    セ<vblex><int>: イセ
  Letter changes: {}
  Nominalizing:
    イェ<vblex><pasv><nx>: アイェㇷ゚
    イタㇰ<vblex><nx><abs>: イタㇰアㇺペ
    エ<vblex><pasv><nx>: アエㇷ゚
    ヌペキ<adj><nx><abs>: ヌペキアㇺペ
    パセ<adj><nx>: パセㇷ゚
    ポロ<adj><nx>: ポロㇷ゚
  Noun:
    アイヌ<n>: アイヌ
    アイヌ<n><pl>: アイヌウタラ
    アイヌ<n><sg>: シネアイヌ
  Noun Gender:
    カムィ<n><m>: オッカイカムィ
    セタ<n><f>: マㇳネセタ
    セタ<n><m>: ピンネセタ
    チカㇷ゚<n><f>: マㇳネチカㇷ゚
    チカㇷ゚<n><m>: ピンネチカㇷ゚
  Noun affinity:
    アアㇰ<n><endear>: アアㇰトノケ
    アアㇰ<n><honor>: アアㇰニㇱパケ
    アトノ<n><honor>: アトノニㇱパケ
    アニㇱ<n><endear>: アニㇱトノケ
    アポホ<n><endear>: アポホトノケ
    アミチ<n><endear>: アミチトノケ
    アユポ<n><endear>: アユポトノケ
    アユポ<n><honor>: アユポニㇱパケ
    アㇰ<n><endear>: アㇰポ
    ト゚レㇱ<n><endear>: ト゚レㇱポ
  Noun number:
    アイアイ<n><pl>: アイアイウタラ
    アイヌ<n><pl>: アイヌウタラ
    アシキペㇳ<n><pl>: アシキペㇳト゚
    アㇳ<n><pl>: アト゚
    アㇺ<n><pl>: アム
    イクㇱペ<n><pl>: ウクㇱペ
    イタㇰ<n><pl>: イタク
    イリワㇰ<n><pl>: ウイリワㇰ
    ウㇺマ<n><pl>: ウㇺマウタラ
    クㇳ<n><pl>: クット゚
    ケマ<n><pl>: ウケマ
    チェㇷ゚<n><pl>: チェㇷ゚ヌ
    ニシ<n><pl>: ニシュ
    ニマキ<n><pl>: ウニマキ
    フラ<n><pl>: フラヌ
    ペ<n><pl>: ペペ
    ペㇳ<n><pl>: ペㇳチャ
  Parts of Speech: {}
  Pronoun:
    アオカィ<pn><p2><sg><mf>: アオカィ
    アノカィ<pn><p1><sg><mf>: アノカィ
    アノカィ<pn><p2><sg><mf>: アノカィ
    アㇷ゚カㇱ<pn><p2><mf>: エアㇷ゚カㇱ
    エ<pn><px2sg><mf>: エコロ
    エアニ<pn><p2><sg><mf>: エアニ
    エカシ<pn><px1pl>: アコロ エカシ
    エチ<pn><px2pl><mf>: エチコロ
    カニ<pn><p1><sg><mf>: カニ
    ク<pn><px1sg><mf>: クコロ
    クアニ<pn><p1><sg><mf>: クアニ
    チ<pn><px1pl><mf>: チコロ
    チョカィ<pn><p1><sg><mf>: チョカィ
    ニㇱパ<pn><px1pl>: アコン ニㇱパ
    ペ<pn><px1pl>: アコロペ
    ミチ<pn><px1pl>: アコロ ミチ
    ヤニ<pn><p2><sg><mf>: ヤニ
    ライケ<pn><p2><mf>: エライケ
  To be completed and not considered for part of Ainu grammar assignment: {}
  Verb:
    クキㇰ<vblex><vaux><pres>: クキㇰシリネ
  Verb Passification:
    ヌ<vblex><pasv>: アヌ
    ヌイェ<vblex><pasv>: アヌイェ
    ライケ<vblex><pasv>: アライケ
  Verb Transitivity:
    キラ<vblex><iv><tvx>: エキラ
    ミナ<vblex><iv><tvx>: エミナ
    ミㇰ<vblex><iv><tvx>: エミㇰ
  Verbalization:
    アット゚ㇱ<n><vz>: アット゚ㇱカラ
    イキリ<n><vz>: イキリカラ
    カヤ<n><vz>: カヤコロ
    シセイ<n><vz>: チセイカラ
    ハウ<n><vz>: ハウコロ
    ホニ<n><vz>: ホニコロ
